Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6523
Applications; deadline.

There shall be no new applications under the Key Employer and Jobs Retention Act filed after May 31, 2021, without further authorization of the Legislature. All applications and all agreements pending, approved, or entered into on or before May 31, 2021, shall continue in full force and effect.

Laws 2020, LB1107, § 66.